cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX z Y 71
SFX z   0         e         sh
SFX z   0         e         [^e]ch
SFX z   ech       chy       ech
SFX z   iep       py        iep
SFX z   er        ry        [^i]er
SFX z   ier       ry        ier
SFX z   ies       sy        ies
SFX z   en        ny        [^i]en
SFX z   el        le        [^i]el
SFX z   ieł       ły        ieł
SFX z   iel       le        iel
SFX z   ień       nie       [pg]ień
SFX z   cień      tnie      cień
SFX z   ek        ki        [^i]ek
SFX z   ciek      ćki       ciek
SFX z   niek      ńki       niek
SFX z   siek      śki       siek
SFX z   iez       zy        iez
SFX z   ez        zy        [^i]ez
SFX z   eł        ły        [^r]zeł
SFX z   zeł       ły        rzeł
SFX z   ec        ce        [cs]zec
SFX z   zec       ce        rzec
SFX z   eł        ły        żeł
SFX z   ec        ce        [djlpż]ec
SFX z   iec       ce        [^cnsz]iec
SFX z   ciec      ćce       ciec
SFX z   niec      ńce       niec
SFX z   siec      śce       siec
SFX z   ziec      źce       ziec
SFX z   óbr       obry      óbr
SFX z   órg       orgi      órg
SFX z   óg        ogi       óg
SFX z   ób        oby       ób
SFX z   óz        ozy       óz
SFX z   óż        oże       óż
SFX z   óźdź      oździe    óźdź
SFX z   ól        ole       ól
SFX z   ół        oły       ół
SFX z   ój        oje       ój
SFX z   ód        ody       ód
SFX z   ódz       odze      ódz
SFX z   ór        ory       ór
SFX z   ót        oty       ót
SFX z   ów        owy       ów
SFX z   ąb        ęby       ąb
SFX z   ąd        ędy       ąd
SFX z   ąg        ęgi       ąg
SFX z   ąz        ęzy       ąz
SFX z   ąż        ęże       ąż
SFX z   eb        by        eb
SFX z   eć        cie       [^i]eć
SFX z   ieć       cie       ieć
SFX z   ep        py        ep
SFX z   est       ty        est
SFX z   et        ty        et
SFX z   ew        wy        ew
SFX z   eł        ły        [^iz]eł
SFX z   zień      nie       dzień
SFX z   sień      śnie      sień
SFX z   eń        nie       [rtzż]eń
SFX z   cioł      tły       cioł
SFX z   zioł      zły       zioł
SFX z   ioł       ły        sioł
SFX z   0         e         ns
SFX z   em        my        em
SFX z   in        y         in
SFX z   0         e         [lnt]z
SFX z   y         e         y
SFX z   0         e         [^l]i
SFX z   i         e         li

SFX p Y 117
SFX p   a         i         [^cghkrzdnłtw]a
SFX p   ca        ki        [^c]ca
SFX p   cca       kki       cca
SFX p   a         ej        da
SFX p   a         i         [^o]ga
SFX p   a         i         [^n]oga
SFX p   a         i         [^a]noga
SFX p   anoga     ejnogi    anoga
SFX p   a         y         [^c]ha
SFX p   a         y         [^u]cha
SFX p   a         y         [^j]ucha
SFX p   ajucha    ejjuchy   ajucha
SFX p   a         i         [^jtos]ka
SFX p   a         iej       [os]ka
SFX p   a         i         [^ó]jka
SFX p   a         i         [^w]ójka
SFX p   a         i         [^d]wójka
SFX p   adwójka   idwójki   adwójka
SFX p   a         i         [^ą]tka
SFX p   a         i         [^i]ątka
SFX p   a         i         [^p]iątka
SFX p   apiątka   ipiątki   apiątka
SFX p   a         ej        [łn]a
SFX p   a         y         [^a]ra
SFX p   a         y         [^i]ara
SFX p   a         y         [^w]iara
SFX p   a         y         [^a]wiara
SFX p   awiara    ejwiary   awiara
SFX p   a         ej        [tw]a
SFX p   a         y         [^s]za
SFX p   a         y         [^u]sza
SFX p   a         y         [^d]usza
SFX p   adusza    ejduszy   adusza
SFX p   anoc      iejnocy   anoc
SFX p   a         e         ca
SFX p   anoga     ejnodze   anoga
SFX p   ajucha    ejjusze   ajucha
SFX p   ka        ce        [^jtos]ka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^ó]jka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^w]ójka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^d]wójka
SFX p   kadwójka  cedwójce  kadwójka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^ą]tka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^i]ątka
SFX p   ka        ce        [^p]iątka
SFX p   kapiątka  cepiątce  kapiątka
SFX p   ara       erze      [^i]ara
SFX p   ara       erze      [^w]iara
SFX p   ara       erze      [^a]wiara
SFX p   awiara    ejwierze  awiara
SFX p   a         ie        rza
SFX p   a         ę         [^dghkłnrtwz]a
SFX p   a         ę         [^o]ga
SFX p   a         ę         [^n]oga
SFX p   a         ę         [^a]noga
SFX p   anoga     ąnogę     anoga
SFX p   a         ę         [^c]ha
SFX p   a         ę         [^u]cha
SFX p   a         ę         [^j]ucha
SFX p   ajucha    ąjuchę    ajucha
SFX p   a         ę         [^jt]ka
SFX p   a         ę         [^ó]jka
SFX p   a         ę         [^w]ójka
SFX p   a         ę         [^d]wójka
SFX p   adwójka   ędwójkę   adwójka
SFX p   a         ę         [^ą]tka
SFX p   a         ę         [^i]ątka
SFX p   a         ę         [^p]iątka
SFX p   apiątka   ępiątkę   apiątka
SFX p   a         ę         [^a]ra
SFX p   a         ę         [^i]ara
SFX p   a         ę         [^w]iara
SFX p   a         ę         [^a]wiara
SFX p   awiara    ąwiarę    awiara
SFX p   a         ę         [^s]za
SFX p   a         ę         [^u]sza
SFX p   a         ę         [^d]usza
SFX p   adusza    ąduszę    adusza
SFX p   anoc      ąnoc      anoc
SFX p   a         ą         [^ghkrz]a
SFX p   a         ą         [^o]ga
SFX p   a         ą         [^n]oga
SFX p   a         ą         [^a]noga
SFX p   anoga     ąnogą     anoga
SFX p   a         ą         [^c]ha
SFX p   a         ą         [^u]cha
SFX p   a         ą         [^j]ucha
SFX p   ajucha    ąjuchą    ajucha
SFX p   a         ą         [^jt]ka
SFX p   a         ą         [^ó]jka
SFX p   a         ą         [^w]ójka
SFX p   a         ą         [^d]wójka
SFX p   adwójka   ądwójką   adwójka
SFX p   a         ą         [^ą]tka
SFX p   a         ą         [^i]ątka
SFX p   a         ą         [^p]iątka
SFX p   apiątka   ąpiątką   apiątka
SFX p   a         ą         [^a]ra
SFX p   a         ą         [^i]ara
SFX p   a         ą         [^w]iara
SFX p   a         ą         [^a]wiara
SFX p   awiara    ąwiarą    awiara
SFX p   a         ą         [^s]za
SFX p   a         ą         [^u]sza
SFX p   a         ą         [^d]usza
SFX p   adusza    ąduszą    adusza
SFX p   anoc      ąnocą     anoc
SFX p   a         o         [^kdnłtw]a
SFX p   a         o         [^jtos]ka
SFX p   a         o         [^ó]jka
SFX p   a         o         [^w]ójka
SFX p   a         o         [^d]wójka
SFX p   adwójka   odwójko   adwójka
SFX p   a         o         [^ą]tka
SFX p   a         o         [^i]ątka
SFX p   a         o         [^p]iątka
SFX p   apiątka   opiątko   apiątka

SFX r Y 10
SFX r   owie      y         [^acgijkloyzżx]owie
SFX r   owie      e         [cjlyż]owie
SFX r   owie      y         [^cds]zowie
SFX r   owie      e         [cds]zowie
SFX r   owie      i         [kg]owie
SFX r   owie      e         iowie
SFX r   owie      ach       owie
SFX r   owie      ami       owie
SFX r   owie      om        owie
SFX r   owie      ów        owie

SFX u Y 20
SFX u   0         ie        [^ąó][bpw]
SFX u   0         i         [^ąó][bpw]
SFX u   0         iom       [^ąó][bpw]
SFX u   0         iami      [^ąó][bpw]
SFX u   0         iach      [^ąó][bpw]
SFX u   ów        owie      ów
SFX u   ów        owi       ów
SFX u   ów        owiom     ów
SFX u   ów        owiami    ów
SFX u   ów        owiach    ów
SFX u   ąb        ębie      ąb
SFX u   ąb        ębi       ąb
SFX u   ąb        ębiom     ąb
SFX u   ąb        ębiami    ąb
SFX u   ąb        ębiach    ąb
SFX u   0         ie        ąp
SFX u   0         i         ąp
SFX u   0         iom       ąp
SFX u   0         iami      ąp
SFX u   0         iach      ąp
