cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
adynamia/ANnp
Aetowie/r
agrobiotechnologia/ANnp
aksjologia/ANnp
Albinowie/r
Algonkinowie/r
algrafia/ANnp
altymetria/ANnp
Ambroży/Xoz
amnioskopia/ANnp
Andrzejkowie/r
angiografia/ANnp
antonimia/ANnp
Apia/p
aplegier/PSZz
Apoloniuszowie/r
archeoetnografia/ANnp
Arminowie/r
artemia/ANnp
astrofotografia/ANnp
Atapaskowie/r
audiometria/ANnp
autoironia/ANnp
babkowiec/PSZz
bakteria/ANnp
Barczewianin/COZtz
Barejowie/r
batalia/ANnp
Bembenek/PSZwz
Berberowie/r
Betania/p
beztlenowiec/PSZz
białodrzew/NQTsu
białostrząb/u
bioklimatologia/ANnp
biorezonans/NQTsz
Bobrowniczanin/COZtz
Bogdania/p
bogomiłowie/r
Bojkowie/r
borek/RSZz
Borysławowie/r
breweria/ANnp
bromowodorek/RSZz
Bronisławowie/r
buduarek/PSZz
Buruszowie/r
Bystrzyczanin/COZtz
carioca/NTpn
Cezarowie/r
chalkografia/ANnp
Chełmianin/COZtz
chirurgia/ANnp
chorobodzień/CPZz
chromoterapia/ANnp
Chrystianowie/r
ciekawy/XYbxyz
cietrzew/u
corokia/ANnp
cukierek/PSZz
Cyntia/ANp
Cyprianowie/r
czarnostrząb/u
czerw/u
Cześkowie/r
czteroetyloołów/u
czteromasztowiec/PSZz
Dahurowie/r
daktylologia/ANnp
Danaowie/r
demonologia/ANnp
diakonia/ANnp
digambarowie/r
diopter/NOPSTZsz
Dobrociechowie/r
Domanowie/r
donżuaneria/ANnp
Doroteuszowie/r
drobnoustrój/RSZz
drop/NOTsu
druzowie/r
dyrek/PSZwz
dysautonomia/ANnp
dziwonia/ANnp
Edgarowie/r
egzogamia/ANnp
Elblążanin/COZtz
elektroencefalografia/ANnp
Elizeuszowie/r
emalia/ANnp
enharmonia/ANnp
Erwinowie/r
etnogenia/ANnp
Euzebiuszowie/r
Fabiuszowie/r
fantasia/ANp
Felaszowie/r
filister/PSZtwz
Filonowie/r
fitonia/ANnp
fotogrametria/ANnp
Fredkowie/r
Galatowie/r
Galek/PSZwz
galwanostegia/ANnp
Genkowie/r
Georgica/p
głośniczek/PSZz
głowotułów/u
Godzisławowie/r
gołąb/u
gordonia/ANnp
Gościsławowie/r
Grajek/PSZwz
Gromisławowie/r
Gurkowie/r
halucynek/PSZz
Haroldowie/r
heliolatria/ANnp
Heńkowie/r
heterotopia/ANnp
Hieronimkowie/r
hipochromia/ANnp
homilopatia/ANnp
Honoriuszowie/r
Ibrahimowie/r
ichtiobiologia/ANnp
igielniczek/PSZz
Igorowie/r
Ireneuszowie/r
ironia/ANnp
Izydorowie/r
Janisławowie/r
Jarkowie/r
Jaroszek/PSZwz
jastrząb/u
jedwab/u
Jeremiaszowie/r
Jonatanowie/r
jopek/PSZz
Juliuszowie/r
Jutowie/r
Kabylia/p
Kaledonowie/r
Kanimirek/PSZwz
kariologia/ANnp
Karolingowie/r
karp/u
karw/u
kątoząb/PSZz
Khmerowie/r
kiełb/u
klimenia/ANnp
kłapeć/CPSZz
kochankowie/r
kompostowiec/PSZz
Konica/Nnp
Koptowie/r
korab/u
kosodrzew/NQTsu
Koszarawianin/COZtz
krąp/u
krętek/PSZz
kryptologia/ANnp
Krystynowie/r
kuferek/PSZz
Kumanowie/r
kurp/u
Kurp/u
kurw/u
larwoterapia/ANnp
Latowiczanin/COZtz
Leoncjuszowie/r
lipemia/ANnp
lisek/PSZz
Longobardowie/r
Ludosławowie/r
łanowiec/PSZtz
łobuzeria/ANnp
Maciejowie/r
mahdi/Xoz
Marianowie/r
markieteria/ANnp
masztowiec/PSZz
meteoropatia/ANnp
Michałowie/r
mijany/Xz
miksobakteria/ANnp
Mirkowie/r
modligroszek/RSZz
modrzew/u
monosomia/ANnp
Mucjuszowie/r
multizbiór/RSZz
namułek/PSZz
nautologia/ANnp
neutronografia/ANnp
Niecisławowie/r
niefachowiec/PSZtz
Nowogrodzianin/COZtz
nów/u
ociec/BHIdeijSZz
Ofelia/ANp
Olecczanin/COZtz
Olkowie/r
ołów/u
orgia/ANnp
ospalec/PSZtz
paleodemografia/ANnp
Paluszek/PSZwz
paremiografia/ANnp
Pawełkowie/r
paw/u
pedel/CDNOPSTZsz
periodontologia/ANnp
pierworodny/XYbxyz
plemieniec/PSZtz
plumeria/ANnp
podobwód/RSZz
pokurw/NOTsu
polisyfonia/ANnp
pomowiec/PSZtz
poziomkowiec/PSZz
półjedwab/u
pradziadkowie/r
prawnuczek/PSZwz
proktologia/ANnp
przedtułów/u
przedziałek/PSZz
Przybysławowie/r
przysionek/PSZz
psychofizjologia/ANnp
radiotelegrafia/ANnp
radiowęgiel/CPZz
Rafałowie/r
robotnikomania/ANnp
rodniowiec/PSZz
Romeowie/r
równonóg/PSZz
Sabinowie/r
saganek/PSZz
sceneria/ANnp
Sergiuszowie/r
siarczek/RSZz
Skandynawia/p
Skarbimirowie/r
skarp/u
Skoczanin/COZtz
smołowiec/PSZz
spektroskopia/ANnp
srebrnodrzew/NQTsu
srebrnogłów/RSZuz
stachanowiec/PSZtz
Stefanowie/r
Stryczek/PSZwz
Styria/p
superjastrząb/u
Symplicjuszowie/r
syneczek/PSZwz
Szampania/p
szczaw/u
szerokobrzeżek/PSZz
szynczek/RSZz
ślep/u
ślip/u
świstek/PSZz
Tainowie/r
teatrologia/ANnp
testomania/ANnp
tetraetyloołów/u
tobołek/PSZz
tołp/u
Tomkowie/r
tritanopia/ANnp
trójwyspowiec/PSZz
tułów/u
Tykocinianin/COZtz
ureterorenoskopia/ANnp
usmarkaniec/PSZtz
wab/u
Waldkowie/r
wandelia/ANnp
Wąsoszanin/COZtz
Wenedowie/r
Wielenianin/COZtz
Windsorowie/r
witania/ANnp
witerunek/RSZz
Wojtkowie/r
woskodrzew/NQTsu
wózek/PSZz
wygwizdów/PSZz
Zacharek/PSZwz
zasób/RSZz
Zbysławowie/r
zdeb/NOTsu
zębokarp/u
zgryźliwiec/PSZtz
złotogłów/RSZuz
zydelek/PSZz
żandarmeria/ANnp
żąp/u
żomp/u
żółw/u
żuraw/u
